District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.13a

Treatment of payment for costs of work participation.

A stipend, allowance, or any other payment to a public assistance recipient reimbursing the recipient for the reasonable costs of participation in a work activity (as described in § 4-205.19d(c)) shall be excluded from income only to the extent any such stipend, allowance, or other payment would be excluded from income under the Food Stamp Program pursuant to 7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq. and 7 C.F.R. § 273.9(b) and (c).

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 513a
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(q), 46 DCR 905

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-205.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.13a.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(q) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(q) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(q) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 2(q) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(q) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).